Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 13 Ad Valorem Taxation
§ 39-13-104.
Taxation rate.

Authorized mill levies. There shall be annually levied and assessed upon the taxable value of property within Wyoming the following state taxes when applicable:

Not to exceed four (4) mills as certified by the board to be credited to the state general fund;

Not to exceed one (1) mill as certified by the board as provided by W.S.

9-4-302

;

The number of mills necessary for the payment of the state debt and interest thereon not to exceed the limitation prescribed by article 16, section 1, Wyoming constitution;

Not to exceed twelve (12) mills for school purposes as certified by the board as provided by W.S.

21-13-303

.

There shall be annually levied and assessed upon the taxable value of property within each Wyoming county the following county taxes when applicable:

Not to exceed twelve (12) mills as determined by the board of county commissioners which shall include mill levies, if any, for the following purposes:

The number of mills to be dedicated to the operation of a county hospital;

The number of mills to be dedicated to the operators of a county library;

The number of mills to be dedicated to the operation of a county fair;

The number of mills to be dedicated to the operation of a county museum;

The number of mills to be dedicated to the support of public assistance and social services;

The number of mills to be dedicated to the operation of an airport;

The number of mills to be dedicated for civil defense;

The number of mills to be dedicated for a county building fund as provided by W.S.

18-4-201

;

The number of mills to be dedicated to road and bridge purposes;

The number of mills to be dedicated for recreation purposes as provided by W.S.

18-9-201

;

The number of mills to be dedicated for public health purposes as provided by W.S.

35-1-304

.

Six (6) mills for school purposes as provided by W.S.

21-13-201

;

The number of mills necessary for the payment of the county debt and interest thereon not to exceed the limitation prescribed by article 16, sections 3 and 5, Wyoming constitution.

There shall be annually levied and assessed upon the taxable value of property within the limits of incorporated cities and towns the following city and town taxes when applicable:

Not to exceed eight (8) mills which shall include mill levies, if any, for the following purposes:

Not to exceed one (1) mill for band concerts;

The number of mills to be dedicated for police pensions;

The number of mills to be dedicated for recreation purposes as provided by W.S.

18-9-201

;

The number of mills to be dedicated for public health purposes as provided by W.S.

35-1-304

.

The number of mills necessary for the payment of the city or town debt including interest thereon not to exceed the limitation prescribed by article 16, section 5, Wyoming constitution.

There shall be annually levied and assessed upon the taxable value of property within the limits of Wyoming school districts the following school taxes when applicable:

Not to exceed the number of mills provided by W.S.

21-13-102

;

Not to exceed two and one-half (2 1/2) mills for vocational and adult education as provided by W.S.

21-12-103

;

Not to exceed one (1) mill for recreation purposes as provided by W.S.

18-9-201

;

The number of mills necessary for the payment of the school district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitation prescribed by article 16, section 5, Wyoming constitution;

The number of mills necessary for a school building fund as provided by W.S.

21-13-501

through

21-13-503

.

There shall be annually levied and assessed upon the taxable value of property within the limits of the following special districts the following special district taxes when applicable:

Not to exceed ten (10) mills by a community college district as provided by W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii) and 21-18-311(f) plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the community college district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitations prescribed by W.S. 21-18-314(a);

Not to exceed six (6) mills by a hospital district as provided by W.S. 35-2-414(b), (c) and (d) plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitations prescribed by W.S.

35-2-415

;

Not to exceed three (3) mills by a special cemetery district as provided by W.S.

35-8-314

plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitations prescribed by W.S.

35-8-316

;

Not to exceed three (3) mills by a fire protection district as provided by W.S. 35-9-203(b) plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitations prescribed by W.S.

35-9-204

;

Not to exceed one (1) mill by a sanitary and improvement district as provided by W.S.

35-3-109

plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitations prescribed by W.S.

35-3-115

;

Not to exceed one (1) mill by a special museum district as provided by W.S. 18-10-213(b) plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitations prescribed by W.S.

18-10-214

;

Not to exceed three (3) mills by a solid waste disposal district as provided by W.S. 18-11-103(a);

Not to exceed one (1) mill for a county weed and pest control district as provided by W.S.

11-5-111

and not to exceed an additional one (1) mill as provided by W.S.

11-5-303

;

Not to exceed eight (8) mills by a water and sewer district as provided by W.S.

41-10-114

plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the limitations prescribed by W.S.

41-10-127

plus the number of mills to create a reserve fund as authorized by W.S.

41-10-119

;

Not to exceed one (1) mill by a water conservancy district as provided by W.S.

41-3-771

and

41-3-775

;

Not to exceed four (4) mills by a rural health care district as provided by W.S. 35-2-708(c);

Not to exceed one (1) mill by a soil and water conservation district as provided by W.S.

11-16-133

and

11-16-134

;

Not to exceed two (2) mills by a senior citizen service district as provided by W.S.

18-15-110

;

Not to exceed two (2) mills by a senior health care district as provided by W.S.

35-2-1203

.

There shall be annually levied and assessed upon the taxable value of the property indicated within the limits of the political subdivision, governmental entity or special district indicated, the following taxes when applicable:

Not to exceed twelve (12) mills by a flood control district upon real property as provided by W.S.

41-3-803

;

Not to exceed one (1) mill as determined by a board of county commissioners upon all property within the county excluding property lying within an incorporated city or town or rural fire district under W.S.

18-3-509

;

Any special assessment as provided by law.

Rail car companies. The department shall each year make a levy equal to the statewide average county, school district and state levy for the year immediately preceding against the values assessed for each of the counties through which the rail cars may have been operated. When the tax due is determined the department shall send to each owner a statement of the amount of the assessment, the rate of levy and the amount of tax due, which shall be paid to the department of revenue. When all these taxes have been collected the state treasurer shall pay to the respective county treasurers the amount due their counties.

The following shall apply to property tax for community colleges:

Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, effective for calendar year 1990 and thereafter a tax of four (4) mills shall be levied on the assessed value of each county in this state in which there is located a community college as defined by W.S. 21-18-102(a) and operated by a community college district established under W.S.

21-18-301

through

21-18-317

. The tax shall be assessed, levied and collected at the same time and in the same manner as other property taxes. Proceeds from the tax shall be paid to the community college in the county in which the taxes are collected and shall be used for the regular support and operation of the college;

The tax imposed under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be reduced by the amount of tax levied against the same property during the same tax year pursuant to W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii). The tax under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall not be imposed if the qualified voters of the area of the county in which the tax under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii) is not imposed vote to reject imposition of the tax under paragraph (i) of this subsection before January 1, 1990. The election shall be held in accordance with procedures provided by W.S.

22-21-104

through

22-21-110

upon petition signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors residing in that area of the county in which a tax under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii) is not imposed. The petition shall be submitted to the board of county commissioners which shall pay all costs incident to the election. The number of electors required for a petition shall be determined by the number of votes cast in that area in the last general election. The tax under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be imposed if no election is held under this paragraph or if the voters vote to not reject imposition of the tax. The ballot in an election under this paragraph shall state the question substantially in the following form:

“Shall a tax for community college of four (4) mills be levied on the assessed value of property in the area of county in which a property tax under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii) for a community college is not currently imposed?” Yes • No •

Click to view

On or before August 1 of each year, the state auditor shall certify to the board the amount of all appropriations made by the legislature of the state of Wyoming and the interest on the public debt for which a levy must be made.

The following shall apply to the certification of tax levies:

All governmental entities in Wyoming having the power to levy or require the levy of ad valorem taxes shall annually notify the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the entity is located, of the amount of tax to be collected against the taxable property of the district, as follows:

On or before the fourth Monday in May by incorporated cities and towns under four thousand (4,000) inhabitants;

On or before July 31 by all governmental entities subject to the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act and all special purpose districts having the authority under general laws to levy taxes or impose assessments;

On or before the first Monday in August by the board for state purposes as provided by W.S.

9-4-302

,

21-13-303

and this act.

Tax levies for all governmental entities as certified by the board of county commissioners except as otherwise provided by law following notification pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection shall be collected by the county treasurer;

No levy certified by the board of county commissioners shall exceed the statutory or constitutional limitation for the governmental entity for which the levy is made and the county treasurer shall not collect any levy in excess of those limitations;

Each special district shall demonstrate to the county commissioners that a combination of documents, in accordance with the department’s rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-102(c)(xxiv) governing tax districts, which includes a legal description or map have been filed with the department, the county clerk and the county assessor that accurately reflect the property within the district, as follows:

Annually, the department and the county assessor shall issue a notice of compliance to each special district that has filed a combination of documents, in accordance with the department’s rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-102(c)(xxiv) governing tax districts, which includes a legal description or map accurately showing the geographical boundaries of the district to date;

Starting January 1, 2006, the board of county commissioners shall not certify tax levies for any special district without a notice of compliance.

The following shall apply to the limitations on taxation by new or reorganized taxing entities:

A governmental entity authorized to levy general property taxes which is formed or organized or which expands its geographical boundaries after January 1 shall not make a tax levy upon the new jurisdictional area for that calendar year. Neither shall the commissioners of the county where the new jurisdiction is located levy on behalf of the taxing entity against property in the new jurisdictional area under the same circumstances;

Taxable property located within an area subjected to a reorganization between like taxing entities is subject to taxation by the entity with controlling jurisdiction on January 1.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2000, ch. 73, § 1; 2003, ch. 27, § 1; 2005, ch. 108, § 2; 2009, ch. 53, § 1; 2020 ch. 17, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

in (k)(iv) and (kv)(iv)(A), inserted “a combination of documents, in accordance with the department's rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-102(c)(xxiv) governing tax districts, which includes a,” in (k)(iv)(B) substituted “2006” for “2005,” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “four (4)” for “two (2)” in (e)(xi).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (e)(xiv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) or subparagraph (b)(i)(I) or (b)(i)(L) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to develop an accurate and comprehensive database of the property within each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of property taxes within that governmental entity. Regardless of the date of formation, each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of ad valorem taxes shall file a map or legal description designating the current geographical boundaries of the governmental entity with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the entity is located in accordance with the department's rules regarding tax districts. Not later than August 1, 2005, the department shall notify each governmental entity subject to the provisions of this section of the entity's most recent filing with the department and whether that filing meets the requirements of this act. If a governmental entity subject to the provisions of this act has not met the requirements of this act, or if its most recent filing with the department is no longer accurate, it shall file not later than November 1, 2005 a map or other legal description of its current boundaries in accordance with this act and the department's rules on taxing districts. Thereafter, filings shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed.) §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 39-13-105.
Exemptions.

The following persons who are bona fide Wyoming residents for at least three (3) years at the time of claiming the exemption are entitled to receive the tax exemption provided by W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv):

An honorably discharged veteran of the Indian Wars, Spanish American War, Filipino insurrection, Boxer rebellion, Puerto Rico campaign or First World War;

An honorably discharged veteran of the Second World War, who served in the military service of the United States between December 7, 1941 and December 31, 1946;

An honorably discharged veteran of the Korean War emergency, who served in the military service of the United States between June 27, 1950 and January 31, 1955;

An honorably discharged veteran of the Vietnam War emergency, who served in the military service of the United States between February 28, 1961 and May 7, 1975;

A surviving spouse, during widowhood or widower hood, of any person qualifying under this subsection or who died while serving honorably during the war, conflict or period described in this section. The tax exemption shall be applied to property the title to which is held by the surviving spouse or to property which is the subject of a trust created by or for the benefit of the surviving spouse;

An honorably discharged veteran who served in the military service of the United States, who was awarded the armed forces expeditionary medal or other authorized service or campaign medal indicating service for the United States in any armed conflict in a foreign country;

through (R) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 74, § 2.

A disabled veteran with a compensable service connected disability certified by the veterans administration or a branch of the armed forces of the United States.

The exemption for veterans is limited to an annual exemption of three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) of assessed value.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, in order to receive the exemption provided by this section the claimant shall file a sworn claim on or before the fourth Monday in May with the county assessor of the county in which the property against which the exemption is sought is located indicating:

Claimant’s right to the exemption;

That during the lifetime of the claimant or the claimant’s spouse, the claimant or the claimant’s spouse is listed as an owner of the property, that the property is the subject of a trust created by or for the benefit of the claimant or the claimant’s spouse, or the claimant or the claimant’s spouse is listed as a purchaser on a valid and effective contract for deed for the property and evidence of the contract for deed has been recorded with the county clerk;

The total tax benefit which the claimant expects to receive under this section to the best of the claimant’s knowledge;

That the exemption for real property shall only apply to the principal residence of the veteran or qualifying surviving spouse;

That the exemption shall be claimed by the veteran or qualifying surviving spouse in not more than one (1) county in this state.

Any claimant who is honorably discharged from military service and files a claim after the fourth Monday in May is entitled to receive the exemption for that taxable year in addition to the exemption allowed during the ensuing tax year if a claim is filed on or before the fourth Monday in May of the ensuing calendar year.

The county assessor shall accept a claim made by a claimant’s spouse, or may waive the filing of a claim and allow an exemption, in the case of a qualified claimant who reentered the armed services of the United States on or before the fourth Monday in May of the year in which the exemption is claimed.

As used in this section “honorably discharged veteran” means a member of the military forces of the United States whose written evidence of separation from the military forces shows an honorable discharge or the rendition of honorable military service.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section and except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, a claimant under this section may file a claim after the fourth Monday in May and receive the exemption for that taxable year but only to modify motor vehicle registration fees as authorized under W.S. 31-3-101(b)(iii).

A surviving spouse, during widowhood or widower hood, is qualified for the tax exemption under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv) and is entitled to apply for it under the same procedure specified in this section for veterans if:

At the time of the spouse’s death, both the veteran and the veteran’s spouse were residents of Wyoming;

The veteran’s spouse has been a resident of Wyoming for at least three (3) years at the time the spouse claims the exemption; and

The veteran would have qualified under subsection (a) of this section for a tax exemption had the veteran survived and applied for the exemption.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 3.

After filing a sworn claim pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, in subsequent years the claimant shall remain qualified for the tax exemption provided by this section and W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv) if the claimant contacts the assessor’s office by telephone, mail or other communication method on or before the fourth Monday in May and confirms that the claimant continues to meet the requirements set forth in this section.

A county assessor shall notify taxpayers of the exemption provided by this section with the assessment schedule sent under W.S. 39-13-103(b)(vii). The notification shall include instructions and timelines for applying for the exemption, including information on the ability of a claimant to confirm qualification for the exemption in subsequent years by contacting the assessor’s office by telephone, mail or other communication method.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 90, § 1; 2003, ch. 76, § 1; 2005 ch. 38, § 1; ch. 74, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 31, § 1; 2007, ch. 100, § 1; ch. 215, § 3; 2008, ch. 62, § 1; 2009, ch. 37, § 1; 2011, ch. 156, § 1; 2020 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 38, § 1, effective January 1, 2005, inserted “or who have been granted individual unemployability status certified by the United States veterans administration” in (b).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 74, § 1, effective January 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(vi), deleting the Wyoming residency requirement for veterans and deleting the list of specific military operations.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendment,

effective January 1, 2007, added (j).

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 100, § 1, in (a), substituted “December 7, 1941” for “December 8, 1941” in (ii), substituted “surviving spouse” for “widow” three times, substituted “widowhood or widower hood” for “her widowhood”, and added (vii); in (b), substituted “three thousand dollars ($3,000.00)” for “two thousand dollars ($2,000.00)”, and deleted the second clause relating to Spanish American War veterans; in (c), substituted “the claimant's spouse” for “his spouse” in (ii) and (iii), and inserted (iv) and (v).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 215, § 3, repealed former (j), which pertained to property tax exemption for Goodwill and the details of the exemption.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “December 31, 1946” for “August 14, 1945” in (a)(ii); substituted “January 31, 1955” for “July 28, 1953” in (a)(iii); substituted “May 7, 1975” for “August 15, 1973” in (a)(iv); and in (c)(ii), substituted “during the lifetime of the claimant or the claimant's spouse,” for “only,” substituted “is listed as an owner of” for “owns,” added “or the claimant or the claimant's spouse is listed as a purchaser on a valid and effective contract for deed for the property and evidence of the contract for deed has been recorded with the county clerk,” and made a related change.

Laws 2008, ch. 62, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, substituted “a sworn claim” for “an annual sworn claim therefor” in the introductory language of (c); “expects to receive” for “has received” in (c)(iii); and added (k).

The 2011 amendment,

in (k), substituted “shall remain qualified” for “may qualify,” substituted “if the clamant contacts” for “by contacting,” and substituted “confirms that the veteran” for “confirms that the claimant.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (k) added “mail” following “by telephone”; and added (m).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2007 ch. 100, § 2, states as follows: “The provisions of this act, including the increased maximum amounts provided for the property tax exemption, shall apply to any veteran who has previously applied for and received a property tax exemption under W.S.

39-13-105

.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 100, § 3, states as follows: “There is appropriated from the general fund to the state treasurer for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008 one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000.00) for the purposes of reimbursement to counties pursuant to W.S. 39-13-102(k).”

Laws 2007, ch. 101, §§ 5-7, state as follows:

“Section 5. (a) It is the intention and direction of the legislature that:

“(i)
All duties of the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program be transferred to the Wyoming business council.
Effective July 1, 2007, all duties of the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program not assumed by the Wyoming business council are terminated;

“(ii)
Any contract, agreement or obligation entered into or assumed by the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program, if the execution or assumption was within the lawful powers of the department of agriculture, be assumed by the Wyoming business council;

“(iii)
Any rule adopted by the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program remain in effect unaltered as rule of the Wyoming business council until amended or repealed by the Wyoming business council.

“Section 6.
There is transferred from the department of agriculture to the Wyoming business council any appropriated or unexpended funds not otherwise obligated and any other property, if any, exclusively dedicated to the Wyoming main street program.

“Section 7.
There is transferred one (1) full-time equivalent position and one (1) part-time equivalent position from the department of agriculture to the Wyoming business council for the purposes of administering the Wyoming main street program.”

Laws 2008, ch. 62, § 2, states as follows:

“There is appropriated from the general fund to the state treasurer two million nine hundred thousand dollars ($2,900,000.00). This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of reimbursing local governments for the exemptions provided under section 1 of this act. When it appears to the state treasurer that the monies appropriated are insufficient to reimburse counties as provided herein, the money available shall be prorated among the counties at an amount less than one hundred percent (100%).”

Severability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 100, § 2, reads: “The provisions of this act, including the increased maximum amounts provided for the property tax exemption, shall apply to any veteran who has previously applied for and received a property tax exemption under W.S.

39-13-105

.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 74, § 3, directs the department of revenue to submit a report, which includes the cost to the state in the amount of money exempted under §

39-13-105

and the breakdown of the exemptions between veterans and widows, to the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee by September 1, 2005.

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 100, § 4, provides: “This act shall apply to ad valorem tax assessed on and after January 1, 2007.”

Constitutionality. —

Law exempting veterans' lands from taxation does not violate United States constitution. Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Exemption of property of veterans promotes public service.

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Legislative intent. —

Exemption of property of veterans was intended to serve a public purpose and among other things to show the gratitude of the people for services rendered by the veterans. Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1959).

Exemption of property of veterans from taxation is not special or local law.

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Nor bonus law. —

Statute exempting property of veterans from taxation is not a bonus law. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Nor retroactive. —

Exemption of property of veterans from taxation held not retroactive, and hence did not relinquish obligation to state. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Application to World War I veterans. —

Exemption in favor of veterans of the first world war applies only to veterans in service of the State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Provisions of Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act relating to taxation of property of military personnel, 32 ALR2d 618.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed.) §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 39-13-106.
Licenses; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed). §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).